Montana, session 2025, SB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 13-12-202, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-12-202. Ballot form and uniformity. (1) The secretary of state shall adopt statewide uniform
rules that prescribe the ballot form for each type of ballot used in this state. The rules must conform to the
provisions of this title unless the voting system used clearly requires otherwise. At a minimum, the rules must
address:
(a) the manner in which each type of ballot may be corrected under 13-12-204;
(b) what provisions must be made on the ballot for write-in candidates;
(c) the size and content of stubs on paper ballots, except as provided in 13-19-106(1);
(d) the placement of the printed words "official ballot" in accordance with 13-13-116;
(d)(e) how unvoted ballots must be handled;
(e)(f) how the number of individuals voting and the number of ballots cast must be recorded; and
(f)(g) the order and arrangement of voting system ballots.
(2) The names of all candidates that appear on the face of a ballot must appear in the same font
size and style.
(3) Notwithstanding 13-19-106(1) and except as provided in 13-3-208, when the stubs are
detached, it must be impossible to distinguish any one of the ballots from another ballot for the same office or
issue.
(4) The ballots must contain the name of each candidate whose nomination is certified under law
for an office and no other names, except that the names of candidates for president and vice president of the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 242
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 242
United States must appear on the ballot as provided in 13-25-101(5)."
Section 2. Section 13-13-116, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-13-116. Paper ballots to be marked -- one ballot to elector. (1) Before delivering a paper ballot
to an elector, the election judges shall ensure that the ballot is individually stamped with the words "official
ballot" are printed on the ballot without part of the mark appearing on the stub, if any.
(2) Each elector must receive from the election judges one of each type of ballot for which the
elector is eligible."
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 242
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 242, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 242
INTRODUCED BY W. MCKAMEY, M. BERTOGLIO, J. ELLIS, S. VANCE, J. KASSMIER, G. NIKOLAKAKOS
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO BALLOT FORM AND UNIFORMITY; AMENDING SECTIONS 13-12-
202 AND 13-13-116, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.